sv: Typ av tallrik: Keramisk; Titan; Turmalin; Övrigt
ko: 플레이트 유형: 세라믹; 티타늄; 전기석; 기타
nb: Platetype: Keramikk; Titan; Turmalin; Annet
th: ประเภทแผ่น: เซรามิก; ไทเทเนียม; ทัวร์มาลีน; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Tipo de placa: Cerâmica; Titânio; Turmalina; Outro
sk-SK: Typ doštičky: Keramika; Titán; Turmalín; Iné
lt-LT: Plokštelės tipas: Keramika; Titanas; Turmalinas; Kita
ro-RO: Tip placă: Ceramic; Titan; Turmalină; Altele
it: Tipo di piastra: Ceramica; Titanio; Tormalina; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de placa: Cerâmica; Titânio; Turmalina; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta plošče: Keramika; Titan; Turmalin; Drugo
zh-TW: 板型: 陶瓷; 鈦; 電氣石; 其他
fr: Type de plaque: Céramique; Titane; Tourmaline; Autre
cs: Typ desky: Keramika; Titanové; Turmalín; Jiné
ru: Тип пластины: Керамика; Титан; Турмалин; Другой
hu: Lemez típusa: Kerámia; Titán; Turmalin; Egyéb
en: Plate type: Ceramic; Titanium; Tourmaline; Other
da: Pladetype: Keramik; Titanium; Turmalin; Andet
el: Τύπος πλάκας: Κεραμικό; Τιτάνιο; Τουρμαλίνη; Άλλο
de: Plattentyp: Keramik; Titan; Turmalin; Sonstiges
es: Tipo de plato: Cerámica; Titanio; Turmalina; Otros
bg-BG: Тип плоча: Керамика; Титан; Турмалин; Други
ja: プレートタイプ: セラミック; チタン; トルマリン; その他
nl: Plaattype: Keramiek; Titanium; Toermalijn; Andere
pl: Typ płyty: Ceramika; Titanium; Turmalina; Inne
hr-HR: Vrsta pločice: Keramika; Titanij; Turmalin; Ostalo
tr: Plaka Tipi: Seramik; Titanyum; Turmalin; Diğer
vi: Loại tấm: Gốm; Titanium; Ngọc bích tỷ; Khác
fi: Laattatyyppi: Keraaminen; Titaani; Turmaliini; Muu
zh-CN: 盘子类型: 陶瓷制品; 钛; 电气石; 其他